Hawaii statutes.
§39-72 Transfers to department.
When there are moneys in the general, special, or revolving funds of the State,
which in the judgment of the director of finance are in excess of the amounts
necessary for the immediate state requirements, the director of finance may
make temporary transfers of moneys to the department for purposes for which
revenue bonds may be issued, if in the judgment of the director of finance the
action will not impede or hamper the necessary financial operations of the
State. The total amount of temporary transfers for any undertaking or loan
program shall not exceed the sum of the unissued revenue bonds authorized
therefor by the legislature. The general, special, or revolving funds shall be
reimbursed from the proceeds upon the eventual issuance and sale of the revenue
bonds. The sale of the revenue bonds shall not be deferred beyond the date
fixed by the director of finance for reimbursement.

The director of finance may make temporary
transfers from the general, special, or revolving funds to any account which
has been set up in the treasury for the payment of revenue bonds, or the
interest thereon, or to any other account which has been set up in the treasury
for the making of other payments as are provided or required in this part. Any
transfer may be made when the account is first opened and prior to any payment
therefrom, or prior to the issuance of revenue bonds for the undertaking or
loan program, or at any time when the account may be temporarily depleted. No
transfer shall be made unless, in the judgment of the director of finance, the
account to which the moneys are transferred will be able to effect
reimbursement on or before the date fixed by the director of finance for
reimbursement.

No interest shall be charged upon any transfer
made, and transfers shall be made only upon the request of the department. [L
1988, c 28, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next